New York, session 2025-2026, A1443.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 20 of section 378 of the executive law, as 2 renumbered by section 3 of part RR of chapter 56 of the laws of 2023, is 3 renumbered subdivision 21 and a new subdivision 20 is added to read as 4 follows: 5 20. Standards requiring new construction of commercial electric vehi- 6 cle charging stations or electric vehicle charging stations which are 7 available to the public to include an external cutoff switch, a sign 8 with the location of and directions to the circuit breaker box, and a 9 brightly labeled sticker placed on the circuit breaker box next to the 10 switch that cuts power to the electric vehicle charging station. A 11 cutoff switch shall be a hand-operated switch which is capable of 12 cutting off all power and electricity to the vehicle without the need of 13 a key or to unlock the device. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03406-01-5